Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5978.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 310e. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this act, an operator's or chauffeur's license issued to a person an individual who is 17 years of age or less shall must be in a form as prescribed in section 310, and valid only upon on the issuance of a graduated driver license. (2) The secretary of state shall designate graduated licensing provisions in a manner that clearly indicates that the person individual is subject to the appropriate provisions described in this section. (3) Except as otherwise provided in section 303, a person an individual who is not less than 14 years and 9 months of age may be issued a level 1 graduated licensing status to operate a motor vehicle if the person individual has satisfied all of the following conditions: (a) Passed a vision test and met health standards as prescribed by the secretary of state. (b) Successfully Either is a qualified home-schooled student or successfully completed segment 1 of a driver education course as that term is defined in section 7 of the driver education provider and instructor act, 2006 PA 384, MCL 256.627, including a minimum of 6 hours of on-the-road driving time with the instructor. (c) Received written approval of a parent or legal guardian. (4) A person An individual issued a level 1 graduated licensing status may operate a motor vehicle only when accompanied either by a licensed parent or legal guardian or, with the permission of the parent or legal guardian, a licensed driver 21 years of age or older. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person an individual is restricted to operating a motor vehicle with a level 1 graduated licensing status for not less than 6 months. (5) A person An individual may be issued a level 2 graduated licensing status to operate a motor vehicle if the person individual has satisfied all of the following conditions: (a) Had a level 1 graduated licensing status for not less than 6 months. (b) Successfully Either is a qualified home-schooled student or successfully completed segment 2 of a driver education course as that term is defined in section 7 of the driver education provider and instructor act, 2006 PA 384, MCL 256.627. (c) Not incurred a moving violation resulting in a conviction or civil infraction determination or been involved in an accident for which the official police report indicates a moving violation on the part of the person individual during the 90-day period immediately preceding application. (d) Presented a certification by the parent or guardian that the person, individual, accompanied by his or her the individual's licensed parent or legal guardian or, with the permission of the parent or legal guardian, any licensed driver 21 years of age or older, has accumulated a total of not less than 50 hours of behind-the-wheel experience including, except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, not less than 10 nighttime hours. The nighttime hours requirement does not apply to a person an individual who has been issued a graduated driver license that permits daylight driving only as provided in R 257.3 of the Michigan Administrative Code. (e) Successfully completed a secretary of state approved driving skills test approved by the secretary of state. The secretary of state may enter into an agreement with another public or private corporation or agency to conduct this driving skills test. Before the secretary of state authorizes a person an individual to administer a corporation's or agency's driver skills testing operations or authorizes an examiner to conduct a driving skills test, that person individual or examiner must complete both a state and Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint based criminal history check through the department of state police. This subdivision applies to a person an individual 16 years of age or over only if the person individual has satisfied subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d). (6) A person An individual issued a level 2 graduated licensing status under subsection (5) shall remain at level 2 for not less than 6 months. A person An individual issued a level 2 graduated licensing status under subsection (5) shall not operate a vehicle under the following circumstances: (a) Between the hours of 10 p.m. and 5 a.m. This subdivision does not apply if either of the following applies: (i) The person individual is accompanied by a parent or legal guardian or a licensed driver 21 years of age or older designated by the parent or legal guardian. (ii) The person individual is operating the vehicle in the course of his or her the individual's employment or while going to or from employment or while going to or from an authorized activity. (b) With more than 1 passenger in the vehicle who is less than 21 years of age. This subdivision does not apply if any of the following apply: (i) The person individual is accompanied by a parent or legal guardian or a licensed driver 21 years of age or older designated by the parent or legal guardian. (ii) Any additional passengers who are less than 21 years of age are members of his or her the individual's immediate family. (iii) The person individual is operating the vehicle in the course of his or her the individual's employment or while going to or from employment or while going to or from an authorized activity. (7) The provisions and provisional period described in subsection (4) or (6) shall must be expanded or extended, or both, beyond the periods described in subsection (4) or (6) if any of the following occur and are recorded on the licensee's driving record during the provisional periods described in subsection (4) or (6) or any additional periods imposed under this subsection: (a) A moving violation resulting in a conviction, civil infraction determination, or probate court disposition. (b) An accident for which the official police report indicates a moving violation on the part of the licensee. (c) A license suspension for a reason other than a mental or physical disability. (d) A violation of subsection (4) or (6). (8) The provisional period described in subsection (4) shall must be extended under subsection (7) until the licensee completes 90 consecutive days without a moving violation, an accident in which a moving violation resulted, suspension, or provisional period violation listed in subsection (7), or until age 18, whichever occurs first. The provisional period described in subsection (6) shall must be extended under subsection (7) until the licensee completes 12 consecutive months without a moving violation, suspension, or restricted period violation listed in subsection (7) or until age 18, whichever occurs first. (9) A person An individual who is not less than 17 years of age may be issued a level 3 graduated licensing status under this subsection if the person individual has completed 12 consecutive months without a moving violation, an accident in which a moving violation resulted, suspension, or restricted period violation listed in subsection (7) while the person individual was issued a level 2 graduated licensing status under subsection (5). (10) Notice shall must be given by first-class mail to the last known address of a licensee if the provisions are expanded or extended as described in subsection (7). (11) A person An individual who violates subsection (4) or (6) is responsible for a civil infraction. (12) If a person an individual is determined responsible for a violation of subsection (4) or (6), the secretary of state shall send written notification of any conviction or moving violation to a designated parent or guardian of the person.individual. (13) For purposes of this section: (a) Upon On conviction for a moving violation, the date of the arrest for the violation shall must be used in determining whether the conviction occurred within a provisional licensure period under this section. (b) Upon On entry of a civil infraction determination for a moving violation, the date of issuance of a citation for a civil infraction shall must be used in determining whether the civil infraction determination occurred within a provisional licensure period under this section. (c) The date of the official police report shall must be used in determining whether a licensee was driving a motor vehicle involved in an accident for which the official police report indicates a moving violation on the part of the licensee or indicates the licensee had been drinking alcoholic liquor. (14) A person An individual shall have his or her the individual's graduated licensing status in his or her the individual's immediate possession at all times when operating a motor vehicle, and shall display the card upon on demand of a police officer. A person An individual who violates this subsection is responsible for a civil infraction. (15) A parent or legal guardian who submits a certificate under section 40(1)(b) of the driver education provider and instructor act, 2006 PA 384, MCL 256.660, in good faith and in substantial compliance with section 40 of the driver education provider and instructor act, 2006 PA 384, MCL 256.660, is immune from both of the following: (a) Civil liability, including, but not limited to, civil liability in an action brought by secretary of state. (b) Any administrative penalty or delay in processing a graduated driver license due solely to the secretary of state's failure to process or record a certification under section 40(2) of the driver education provider and instructor act, 2006 PA 384, MCL 256.660. (16) The secretary of state shall not impose additional documentation or procedural requirements on a qualified home-schooled student beyond those explicitly required under this section and section 40 of the driver education provider and instructor act, 2006 PA 384, MCL 256.660, to receive a driver license. (17) (15) As used in this section: , "authorized (a) "Authorized activity" means any of the following: (i) (a) A school or a school-sanctioned event or activity. For purposes of this subdivision, school means a public or private school, including a home school. (ii) (b) A sporting event or activity, or extracurricular event or activity, that is not school-sanctioned but that is part of an official sports league or association or an official extracurricular club, or that is paid for as a service offered by a business specializing in those events or activities or training for those events or activities. (iii) (c) A class or program of vocational instruction offered by a college, community college, nonprofit association, or unit of government or by a business specializing in vocational training. (iv) (d) An event or activity sponsored by a religious organization that is tax-exempt under federal law. (v) (e) Transporting an individual in need of immediate emergency care or personal protection to a health care professional, hospital, police station, domestic violence shelter, or public safety location. (b) "Qualified home-schooled student" means a home-schooled student as that term as defined in section 40 of the driver education provider and instructor act, 2006 PA 384, MCL 256.660, who has completed a curriculum administered by the student's parent or legal guardian, as provided under section 40(1)(a) of the driver education provider and instructor act, 2006 PA 384, MCL 256.660. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5977 (request no. H03572'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.